North Carolina statutes. Chapter 158. Local Development.
Article 2. Economic Development Commissions.

§ 158-8.
Creation of municipal, county or regional commissions authorized; composition; joining or withdrawing from regional commissions.

The governing body of any municipality or the board of county commissioners of any county may by resolution create an economic development commission for said municipality or county. The governing bodies of any two or more municipalities and/or counties may by joint resolution, adopted by separate vote of each governing body concerned, create a regional economic development commission. A municipal or county economic development commission shall consist of from three to nine members, named for terms and compensation (if any) fixed by its respective governing body. The membership, compensation (if any), and terms of a regional economic development commission, and the formula for its financial support, shall be fixed by the joint resolution creating the commission. Additional governmental units may join a regional commission with the consent of all existing members. Any governmental unit may withdraw from a regional commission on two years’ notice to the other members. The resolution creating a municipal, county, or regional economic development commission may be modified, amended, or repealed in the same manner as it was originally adopted.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 2; 2013-360, s. 15.28(a); 2013-363, s. 5.7(a).

Local Modification.

Cherokee: 1973, c. 1406; Columbus: 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 706, s. 1; Graham: 1973, c. 1406; Jackson: 1973, c. 1406; Macon: 2015-15, s. 1; Nash: 1989, c. 697, s. 1; Swain: 1973, c. 1406; Union: 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 706, s. 1.

§§ 158-8.1 through 158-8.8.
[Repealed]

Repealed effective June 30, 2014, by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), as amended by Session Laws 2013-363, s. 5.7(a).

History.

1993, c. 321, s. 309(a); c. 561, s. 17(a); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, ss. 28.7(j), 28.8(a), 28.8(b); 1995, c. 488, s. 49(a), (b); c. 507, s. 25.5(a); c. 509, ss. 103-105; 1999-237, s. 16.5(a); 2010-184, s. 1, repealed by 2013-363, s. 5.7(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-8.2; 1993, c. 321, s. 309.1(a); c. 561, s. 17(b); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, ss. 28.7(k), 28.7(l), 28.8(c), 28.8(d), 28.9; 1995, c. 509, ss. 106-109; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 1997-495, s. 87(a); 1999-237, ss. 16.5(b), 16.6(a); 2007-93, s. 3; 2010-184, s. 2; repealed by 2013-363, s. 5.7(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-8.3; 1993, c. 321, s. 309.2(a); c. 561, s. 17(c); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, ss. 28.7(m), 28.8(e), 28.8(f); 1995, c. 509, ss. 110, 111; 1997-155, s. 1; 1999-237, s. 16.5(c); 2010-184, s. 3; 2013-360, s. 15.28B(a); repealed by 2013-363, s. 5.7(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-8.4; 1997-495, s. 86; repealed by 2013-363, s. 5.7(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 159-8.4A; 2010-184, s. 4; repealed by 2013-363, s. 5.7(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-8.5; 2006-263, s. 1; 2007-323, s. 13.7(g); repealed by 2013-363, s. 5.7(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-8.6; 2006-263, s. 1; repealed by 2013-363, s. 5.7(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-8.7; 2006-263, s. 1; repealed by 2013-363, s. 5.7(a), effective June 30, 2014. s. 158-8.8; 2006-263, s. 1; repealed by 2013-363, s. 5.7(a), effective June 30, 2014.

§ 158-9.
Organization of commission; rules and regulations; committees; meetings.

Upon its appointment, the economic development commission shall promptly meet and elect from among its members a chairman and such other officers as it may choose, for such terms as it shall prescribe in its rules and regulations. The commission shall adopt such rules and regulations not inconsistent herewith as it may deem necessary for the proper discharge of its duties. The chairman may appoint such committees as the work of the commission may require. The commission shall meet regularly, at least once every three months, at places and dates specified in the rules. Special meetings may be called as specified in the rules.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 2; 2013-360, s. 15.28(a); 2013-363, s. 5.7(a).

§ 158-10.
Staff and personnel; contracts for services.

Within the limits of appropriated funds, the commission may hire and fix the compensation of any personnel necessary to its operations, contract with consultants for such services as it may require, and contract with the State of North Carolina or the federal government, or any agency or department thereof, for such services as may be provided by such agencies; and it is hereby empowered to carry out the provisions of such contracts as it may enter.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 2; 2013-360, s. 15.28(a); 2013-363, s. 5.7(a).

§ 158-11.
Office and equipment.

Within the limits of appropriated funds, the commission may lease, rent, or purchase, or otherwise obtain suitable quarters and office space for its staff, and may lease, rent, or purchase necessary furniture, fixtures, and other equipment.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 2; 2013-360, s. 15.28(a); 2013-363, s. 5.7(a).

§ 158-12.
Fiscal affairs generally; appropriations.

The commission may accept, receive, and disburse in furtherance of its functions any funds, grants, and services made available by the federal government and its agencies, the State government and its agencies, any municipalities or counties, and by private and civic sources.

Each municipality or county shall have authority to appropriate funds to any local or regional economic development commission which it may have created. These appropriations may be funded by levy of property taxes pursuant to

G.S. 153A-149

and

G.S. 160A-209

and by the allocation of other revenues whose use is not otherwise restricted by law.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 2; 1973, c. 803, s. 44; c. 1446, s. 26; 2013-360, s. 15.28(a); 2013-363, s. 5.7(a).

§ 158-12.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed effective June 30, 2014, by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 15.28(a), as amended by Session Laws 2013-363, s. 5.7(a).

History.

2000-67, s. 14.9; 2005-364, s. 3; 2007-93, s. 4; 2008-134, s. 77; repealed by 2013-363, s. 5.7(a), effective June 30, 2014.

§ 158-13.
Powers and duties.

Any economic development commission created pursuant to this Article shall:

Receive from any municipal, county, joint, or regional planning board or commission with jurisdiction within its area an economic development program for part or all of the area;

Formulate projects for carrying out such economic development program, through attraction of new industries, encouragement of existing industries, encouragement of agricultural development, encouragement of new business and industrial ventures by local as well as foreign capital, and other activities of a similar nature;

Conduct industrial surveys as needed, advertise in periodicals or other communications media, furnish advice and assistance to business and industrial prospects which may locate in its area, furnish advice and assistance to existing businesses and industries, furnish advice and assistance to persons seeking to establish new businesses or industries, and engage in related activities;

Encourage the formation of private business development corporations or associations which may carry out such projects as securing and preparing sites for industrial development, constructing industrial buildings, or rendering financial or managerial assistance to businesses and industries; furnish advice and assistance to such corporations or associations;

(4a)

Use grant funds to make loans for purposes permitted by the federal government, by the grant agreement and in furtherance of economic development; the economic development commission may delegate to another organization or agency the implementation of the grant’s purposes, subject to approval by the federal agency involved and the commission’s board of directors.

Carry on such other activities as may be necessary in the proper exercise of the functions described herein.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 2; 1979, c. 775; 2013-360, s. 15.28(a); 2013-363, s. 5.7(a).

§ 158-14.
Regional planning and economic development commissions authorized.

Any municipalities and/or counties desiring to exercise the powers granted by this Article may, at their option, create a regional planning and economic development commission, which shall have and exercise all of the powers and duties granted to a regional economic development commission under this Article and in addition the powers and duties granted to a regional planning commission under Article 23 of Chapter 153. In the event that such a combined commission is created, it shall keep separate books of accounts for appropriations and expenditures made pursuant to this Article and for appropriations and expenditures made pursuant to Article 23 of Chapter 153. The financial limitations set forth in each such Article shall govern expenditures made pursuant to such Article.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 2; 1965, c. 431, s. 2; 2013-360, s. 15.28(a); 2013-363, s. 5.7(a).

§ 158-15.
Powers granted herein supplementary.

The powers granted to counties and municipalities by this Article shall be deemed supplementary to any powers heretofore or hereafter granted by any general or local act for the same or similar purposes, and in any case where the provisions of this Article conflict with or are different from the provisions of any other act, the board of county commissioners or the municipal governing board may in its discretion proceed in accordance with the provisions of this Article or, as an alternative method, in accordance with the provisions of such other act.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 2; 2013-360, s. 15.28(a); 2013-363, s. 5.7(a).